Washington statutes.
RCW 31.20.130

Publication of annual statement of assets and liabilities.

A development credit corporation, on or before February 15th of each year, shall publish in three consecutive issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the area or areas where the corporation is located a statement of assets and liabilities as of December 31st of the preceding year.

[ 1959 c 213 s 13.]